Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Violations—Procedures

4-21-301. Discriminatory practices.

It is a discriminatory practice for a person or for two (2) or more persons to:

Retaliate or discriminate in any manner against a person because such person has opposed a practice declared discriminatory by this chapter or because such person has made a charge, filed a complaint, testified, assisted or participated in any manner in any investigation, proceeding or hearing under this chapter;

Willfully interfere with the performance of a duty or the exercise of a power by the commission or one (1) of its members or representatives;

Willfully obstruct or prevent a person from complying with this chapter or an order issued under this chapter; or

Violate the terms of a conciliation agreement made pursuant to this chapter.

No individual employee or agent of an employer shall be liable for any violation of part 4 of this chapter that any employer shall be found to have committed.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 16; T.C.A., §§ 4-2114, 4-21-114; Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Delimiting Title VII: Reverse Religious Discrimination and Proxy Claims in Employment Discrimination Litigation, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 239 (2014).

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning employment litigation in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 995.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to all actions accruing on or after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 7 provided that nothing in the act shall require the Tennessee human rights commission, created pursuant to §4-21-201, to provide training or education in addition to its current operations.

Law Reviews.

Confusion over “Comparables”: Will the Sixth Circuit Stick to One Standard with Respect to “Similarly Situated” Employees? (David L. Hudson Jr.), 37 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 25 (2001).

Effects of the Sutton Trilogy, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 705 (2001).

Employees' Assumption of Risk: Real or Illusory Choice?, 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 35 (1984).

Employment Law — Carr v. United Parcel Service: Individual Liability Under the Tennessee Human Rights Act, 29 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

FMLA Notice Requirements and the Chevron Test: Maintaining a Hard-Fought Balance, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 261 (2002).

Perceived Disabilities, Social Cognition, and “Innocent Mistakes,” 55 Vand. L. Rev. 481 (2002).

Proving an Employer's Intent: Disparate Treatment Discrimination and the Stray Remarks Doctrine After Reeves v. Sanderson Plumbing Products, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 219 (2002).

The Faragher and Ellerth Problem: Lower Courts' Confusion Regarding the Definition of “Supervisor,” 54 Vand. L. Rev. 123 (2001).

The Law at Work: Retaliation Claims: More Difficult Standards under Nassar and Ferguson, 49 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2013).

The Sins of Innocence in Standing Doctrine, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 297 (2015).

Viva state employment law! State law retaliation claims in a post-Crawford/Burlington Northern World (Alex B. Long), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (2010).

When Telling the Truth Costs You Your Job: Tennessee's Employment-at-Will Doctrine and the Need for Change (Chad E. Wallace), 39 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2003).

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee human rights commission — Authority to investigate “improper administration of justice,” OAG 99-192, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 206 (9/28/99).

4-21-302. Complaints — Consideration by commission.

A person claiming to be aggrieved by a discriminatory practice, or a member of the commission may file with the commission a written sworn complaint stating that a discriminatory practice has been committed, setting forth the facts sufficient to enable the commission to identify the persons charged, referred to in this part as the respondent. Within ten (10) days after receipt of the complaint, the commission shall serve on the complainant a notice acknowledging the filing of the complaint and informing the complainant of the respondent's time limits and choice of forums under this chapter.

The commission staff, or a person designated pursuant to its rules, shall promptly investigate the matter to determine whether the discriminatory practice exists and shall within ten (10) days furnish the respondent with a copy of the complaint and a notice advising the respondent of the respondent's procedural rights and obligations under this chapter.

The complaint must be filed within one hundred eighty (180) days after the commission of the alleged discriminatory practice.

The commission staff, or a person designated pursuant to its rules, shall commence an investigation of the complaint within thirty (30) days after the filing of the complaint. The commission staff, or designee, shall promptly investigate the matter to determine whether the discriminatory practice exists.

If it is determined that there is no reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory practice, the commission shall furnish a copy of the order to the complainant, the respondent, and such public officers and persons as the commission deems proper.

The complainant, within thirty (30) days after receiving a copy of the order dismissing the complaint, may file with the commission an application for reconsideration of the order.

Upon such application, the commission or an individual designated pursuant to its rules shall make a new determination within thirty (30) days whether there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory practice.

If it is determined that there is no reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory practice, the commission shall issue an order dismissing the complaint after reconsideration, and furnishing a copy of the order to the complainant, the respondent, and such public officers and persons as the commission deems proper.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 17; T.C.A., §§ 4-2115, 4-21-115; Acts 1992, ch. 1027, §§ 3, 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

Law Reviews.

Employment Law — Carr v. United Parcel Service: Individual Liability Under the Tennessee Human Rights Act, 29 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. The human rights commission has authority to process complaints alleging violations of T.C.A. §4-21-904, which includes the authority to investigate such complaints under T.C.A. §4-21-302; the commission is also authorized to review complaints filed with state agencies under T.C.A. §4-21-905 to determine whether Title VI of the Federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq., is applicable, OAG 00-107, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/12/00).

4-21-303. Conciliation agreements — Temporary relief.

If the staff determines after investigation, or if the commission or its delegate determines after the review provided for in § 4-21-302 that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory practice, the commission staff shall endeavor to eliminate the alleged discriminatory practices by conference, conciliation and persuasion.

The terms of a conciliation agreement reached with a respondent shall require the respondent to refrain from discriminatory practices in the future, and shall make such further provisions as may be agreed upon between the commission or its assigned staff and the respondent.

If a conciliation agreement is entered into, the commission shall issue and serve on the complainant an order stating its terms. A copy of the order shall be delivered to the respondent, and such public officers and persons as the commission deems proper.

Except for the terms of the conciliation agreement, neither the commission nor any officer or employee thereof shall make public, without the written consent of the complainant and the respondent, information concerning efforts in a particular case to eliminate discriminatory practice by conference, conciliation or persuasion, whether or not there is a determination of reasonable cause or a conciliation agreement. The conciliation agreement itself shall be made public unless the complainant and the respondent otherwise agree, and the commission also determines that disclosure is not required to further the purposes of this chapter.

At the expiration of one (1) year from the date of a conciliation agreement, and at other times in its reasonable discretion, the commission staff may investigate whether the terms of the agreement have been and are being complied with by the respondent.

Upon finding that the terms of the agreement are not being complied with by the respondent, the commission shall take such action as it deems appropriate to assure compliance.

At any time after a complaint is filed, the commission may file an action in the chancery court or circuit court in a county in which the subject of the complaint occurs, or in a county in which a respondent resides or has the respondent's principal place of business, seeking appropriate temporary relief against the respondent, pending final determination of proceedings under the chapter, including an order or decree restraining such respondent from doing or procuring any act tending to render ineffectual any order the commission may enter with respect to the complaint. The court has the power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 18; T.C.A., §§ 4-2116, 4-21-116; Acts 1992, ch. 1027, § 5; 1996, ch. 777, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

4-21-304. Hearings.

In complaints involving discrimination in employment and public accommodations, within ninety (90) days after an administrative determination of reasonable cause to believe that discrimination took place, unless the commission has issued an order stating the terms of a conciliation agreement, or, in those cases in which the terms of a conciliation agreement have been kept confidential, has issued an order stating that the case has been satisfactorily conciliated, the commission shall serve on the respondent by mail or in person a written notice, together with a copy of the complaint as it may have been amended, or a copy of the letter of determination, requiring the respondent to answer the allegation of the complaint at a hearing before a hearing examiner or hearing examiners, or another individual pursuant to its rules, at a time and place specified by the hearing examiner or examiners after conference with the parties or their attorneys.

A copy of the notice shall be furnished to the complainant, and such public officers and persons as the commission deems proper.

In complaints involving housing discrimination only, if the commission has determined that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory housing practice, and if the complaint has not been resolved through a conciliation agreement, and if neither party has made an election for a civil action pursuant to § 4-21-312, then the commission shall commence a hearing in accordance with this subsection (a).

All hearings conducted under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5, part 3 of this title.

A member of the commission who filed the complaint or endeavored to eliminate the alleged discriminatory practice by conference, conciliation or persuasion shall not participate in the hearing or in the subsequent deliberation of the commission.

The respondent may file an answer with the commission by registered or certified mail in accordance with the rules of the commission before the hearing date. The respondent may amend an answer at any time prior to the issuance of an order based on the complaint, but no order shall be issued unless the respondent has had an opportunity of a hearing on the complaint or amendment on which the order is based.

A respondent, who has filed an answer or whose default in answering has been set aside for good cause shown, may appear at the hearing with or without representation, may examine and cross-examine witnesses and the complainant, and may offer evidence.

The complainant and the complainant's private attorney, and, in the discretion of the commission, any person, may intervene, examine, and cross-examine witnesses, and present evidence.

If the respondent fails to answer the complaint, the commission may enter the respondent's default. Unless the default is set aside for good cause shown, the hearing may proceed on the evidence in support of the complaint.

Efforts at conference, conciliation and persuasion shall not be received in evidence.

Testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and transcribed. If the testimony is not taken before the commission, the record shall be transmitted to the commission.

In a proceeding under this chapter, the production of a written, printed or visual communication, advertisement or other form of publication, or a written inquiry, or record, or other document purporting to have been made by a person shall be prima facie evidence that it was authorized by the person.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 19; 1979, ch. 422, § 26; T.C.A., §§ 4-2117, 4-21-117; Acts 1992, ch. 1027, § 6; 2016, ch. 863, § 1.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 863, 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all actions accruing on or after April 19, 2016.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

Law Reviews.

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

4-21-305. Findings and orders.

If the commission determines that the respondent has not engaged in a discriminatory practice, the commission shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue an order dismissing the complaint. A copy of the order shall be delivered to the complainant, the respondent, and such public officers and persons as the commission deems proper.

If the commission determines that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory practice, the commission shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue an order requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the discriminatory practice and to take such affirmative action as in the judgment of the commission will carry out the purposes of this chapter. A copy of the order shall be delivered to the respondent, the complainant, and to such public officers and persons as the commission deems proper.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 20; T.C.A., §§ 4-2118, 4-21-118.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

4-21-306. Remedies.

Affirmative action ordered under this section may include, but is not limited to:

Hiring, reinstatement or upgrading of employees with or without back pay. Interim earnings or amounts earnable with reasonable diligence by the person or persons discriminated against shall operate to reduce the back pay otherwise allowable;

Admission or restoration of individuals to union membership, admission to, or participation in, a guidance program, apprenticeship, training program, on-the-job training program, or other occupational training or retraining program, and the utilization of objective criteria in the admission of individuals to such programs;

Admission of individuals to a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement;

The extension to all individuals of the full and equal enjoyment of the advantages, facilities, privileges and services of the respondent;

Reporting as to the manner of compliance;

Posting notices in conspicuous places in the respondent's place of business in the form prescribed by the commission and inclusion of such notices in advertising material;

Payment to the complainant of damages for an injury, including humiliation and embarrassment, caused by the discriminatory practice, and cost, including a reasonable attorney's fee;

Such other remedies as shall be necessary and proper to eliminate all the discrimination identified by the evidence submitted at the hearing or in the record; and

In cases involving discriminatory housing practices only, payment by the respondent of a civil penalty:

In an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) if the respondent has not been adjudged to have committed any prior unlawful discriminatory housing practices;

In an amount not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed one (1) other unlawful discriminatory housing practice during the five-year period ending on the date of the filing of the complaint; or

In an amount not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed two (2) or more unlawful discriminatory housing practices during the seven-year period ending on the date of the filing of the complaint;

If the acts constituting the discriminatory housing practice that is the object of the complaint are committed by the same natural person who has been previously adjudged to have committed acts constituting an unlawful discriminatory housing practice, then the civil penalties set forth in subdivisions (a)(9)(A)(ii) and (iii) may be imposed without regard to the period of time within which any subsequent discriminatory housing practice occurred.

The commission may publish, or cause to be published, the names of persons who have been determined to have engaged in a discriminatory practice.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, §§ 21; T.C.A., §§ 4-2119, 4-21-119; Acts 1992, ch. 1027, § 7.

Cross-References. Additional remedies preserved, §4-21-311.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

Law Reviews.

Age Discrimination: A Growth Industry (Charles H. Anderson), 25 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1989).

Do State Fair Employment Statutes by “Negative Implication” Preclude Common-Law Wrongful Discharge Claims Based on the Public Policy Exception?, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 527 (1991).

Election of Remedies in Tennessee: Making the Right Choices (Steven W. Feldman), 37 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Employment Law — Carr v. United Parcel Service: Individual Liability Under the Tennessee Human Rights Act, 29 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

4-21-307. Judicial review.

A complainant, respondent or intervenor aggrieved by an order of the commission, including an order dismissing a complaint or stating the terms of a conciliation agreement, may obtain judicial review, and the commission may obtain an order of the court for enforcement of its order, in a proceeding brought in the chancery court or circuit court in which the alleged discriminatory practice that is the subject of the order occurred or in which a respondent resides or transacts business.

The proceeding for review or enforcement is initiated by filing a petition in court.

Copies of the appeal shall be served upon all parties of record.

Within thirty (30) days after the service of the petition for appeal upon the commission or its filing by the commission, or within such further time as the court may allow, the commission shall transmit to the court the original or a certified copy of the entire record upon which the order is based, including a transcript of testimony, which need not be printed.

By stipulation of all parties to the review proceeding, the record may be shortened.

The findings of fact of the commission shall be conclusive unless clearly erroneous in view of the probative and substantial evidence on the whole record.

The court has the power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and to enter an order enforcing, modifying and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the order of the commission, or remanding the case to the commission for further proceedings.

All such proceedings shall be heard and determined by the chancery court or circuit court and court of appeals as expeditiously as possible and with lawful precedence over other matters.

If the commission has failed to schedule a hearing in accordance with § 4-21-304 or has failed to issue an order within one hundred eighty (180) days after the complaint is filed, the complainant, respondent or an intervenor may petition the chancery court or circuit court in a county in which the alleged discriminatory practice set forth in the complaint occurs or in which the petitioner resides or has the petitioner's principal place of business for an order directing the commission to take such action. The court shall follow the procedure set forth in subsection (b) so far as applicable.

The court shall not consider any matter not considered by, nor any objection not raised before, the hearing examiner or examiners unless the failure of a party to present such matter to or raise such objection before the hearing examiner or examiners are excused because of good cause shown.

A party may move the court to remand the case to the commission in the interest of justice for the purpose of adducing additional specified material evidence and seeking findings thereon; provided, that the party shows good cause for the failure to adduce such evidence before the commission.

The jurisdiction of the chancery court or circuit court shall be exclusive, and its final judgment or decree shall be subject to review by the court of appeals as provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The commission's copy of the testimony shall be available to all parties for examination without cost during business hours at the commission's office in Nashville.

A proceeding under this section must be initiated within thirty (30) days after a copy of the order of the commission is petitioned or the petition is filed under § 4-21-304.

If no proceeding is so initiated, the commission may obtain a decree of the court of enforcement of its order upon showing that a copy of the petition for enforcement was served on the respondent and the respondent is subject to the jurisdiction of the court.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 22; T.C.A., §§ 4-2120, 4-21-120; Acts 1996, ch. 777, §§ 2-5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

4-21-308. Access to records.

In connection with an investigation of a complaint filed under this chapter, the commission or its designated representative at any reasonable time may request access to premises, records and documents relevant to the complaint and the right to examine a photograph and copy evidence.

Every person subject to this chapter shall:

Make and keep records relevant to the determination of whether discriminatory practices have been or are being committed;

Preserve such records for such periods; and

Make such reports therefrom, as the commission shall prescribe by regulation or order, as reasonably necessary, or appropriate for the enforcement of this chapter or the regulation or orders thereunder.

So as to avoid undue burdens on persons subject to this chapter, records and reports required by the commission under this section shall conform as near as may be to similar records and reports required by federal law and the laws of other states and to customary recordkeeping practice.

If a person fails to permit access, examination, photographing or copying or fails to make, keep or preserve records or make reports in accordance with this section, the chancery court in Davidson county or the chancery court or circuit court for the county in which such person is found, resides, or has such person's principal place of business, upon application of the commission, may issue an order requiring compliance.

The commission, by regulation, shall require each person subject to this chapter who controls an apprenticeship or other training program to keep all records reasonably necessary to carry out the purpose of the chapter, including, but not limited to, a list of applicants who wish to participate in such program, including the chronological order in which applications were received, and shall furnish to the commission upon request, a detailed description of the manner in which persons are selected to participate in the apprenticeship or other training programs.

A person who believes that the application to it of a regulation or order issued under this section would result in undue hardship may apply to the commission for an exemption from the application of the regulation or order. If the commission finds the application of the regulation or order to the person in question would impose an undue hardship, the commission may grant appropriate relief.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 23; T.C.A., §§ 4-2121, 4-21-121; Acts 1996, ch. 777, § 6; 2005, ch. 111, § 1.

4-21-309. Subpoenas.

Upon written application to the commission, a party to a proceeding is entitled as of right to the issuance of subpoenas for deposition or hearing in the name of the commission by an individual designated pursuant to its rules requiring attendance and the giving of testimony by witnesses and the production of documents.

A subpoena so issued shall show on its face the name and address of the party at whose request the subpoena is directed.

On petition of the person to whom the subpoena is directed and notice to the requesting party, the commission or an individual designated pursuant to its rules may vacate or modify the subpoena.

Depositions of witnesses may be taken as prescribed by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Witnesses whose depositions are taken, or who are summoned before the commission or its agents, will be entitled to the same witness and mileage fees as are paid to the witnesses subpoenaed in chancery courts of the state.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the commission, the chancery court or circuit court of the county in which the person is found, resides, or has the person's principal place of business, upon application of the commission or the party requesting the subpoena, may issue an order requiring compliance. In any proceeding brought under this section, the court may modify or set aside the subpoena.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 24; T.C.A., §§ 4-2122, 4-21-122; Acts 1996, ch. 777, § 7.

Cross-References. Depositions, Tenn. R. Civ. P. Rules 30, 31, 32.

Witness compensation, title 24, ch. 4.

4-21-310. Resistance to, obstruction, etc., of commission.

Any person who willfully resists, prevents, impedes or interferes with the performance of a duty or the exercise of a power by the commission or one (1) of its members or representatives commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 25; T.C.A., §§ 4-2123, 4-21-123; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

4-21-311. Additional remedies preserved — Civil Action — Allocations of Burden of Proof.

Any person injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a civil cause of action in chancery court or circuit court.

In such an action, the court may issue any permanent or temporary injunction, temporary restraining order, or any other order and may award to the plaintiff actual damages sustained by such plaintiff, together with the costs of the lawsuit, including a reasonable fee for the plaintiff's attorney of record, all of which shall be in addition to any other remedies contained in this chapter.

In cases involving discriminatory housing practices, the court may award punitive damages to the plaintiff, in addition to the other relief specified in this section and this chapter. In addition to the remedies set forth in this section, all remedies described in § 4-21-306, except the civil penalty described in § 4-21-306(a)(9), shall be available in any lawsuit filed pursuant to this section.

A civil cause of action under this section shall be filed in chancery court or circuit court within one (1) year after the alleged discriminatory practice ceases, and any such action shall supersede any complaint or hearing before the commission concerning the same alleged violations, and any such administrative action shall be closed upon such filing.

In any civil cause of action alleging a violation of this chapter or of § 8-50-103, the plaintiff shall have the burden of establishing a prima facie case of intentional discrimination or retaliation. If the plaintiff satisfies this burden, the burden shall then be on the defendant to produce evidence that one (1) or more legitimate, nondiscriminatory reasons existed for the challenged employment action. The burden on the defendant is one of production and not persuasion. If the defendant produces such evidence, the presumption of discrimination or retaliation raised by the plaintiff's prima facie case is rebutted, and the burden shifts to the plaintiff to demonstrate that the reason given by the defendant was not the true reason for the challenged employment action and that the stated reason was a pretext for illegal discrimination or retaliation. The foregoing allocations of burdens of proof shall apply at all stages of the proceedings, including motions for summary judgment. The plaintiff at all times retains the burden of persuading the trier of fact that the plaintiff has been the victim of intentional discrimination or retaliation.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 26; T.C.A., §§ 4-2124, 4-21-124; Acts 1989, ch. 374, § 1; 1992, ch. 1027, § 8; 1996, ch. 777, §§ 8, 9; 2011, ch. 461, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Acts 2011, ch. 461, § 4 provided that the act, which added subsection (e), shall apply to all causes of action accruing on or after June 10, 2011.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71; 9 Tenn. Juris., Damages, § 15; 22 Tenn. Juris., Res Judicata, § 32.

Law Reviews.

Age Discrimination: A Growth Industry (Charles H. Anderson), 25 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1989).

Tennessee Human Rights Act: Court of Appeals addresses limitations period of THRA (Timothy S. Bland and Licia M. Williams), 38 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (2002).

The Law at Work: Variation in State and Federal Pleading Standards: Webb and Veasy (Edward G. Phillips with Brandon L. Morrow), 49 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2013).

4-21-312. Election of civil action.

This section applies only in cases involving discriminatory housing practices.

If the commission has determined that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory housing practice and if the complaint has not been resolved through a conciliation agreement, the commission shall notify the complainant and the respondent in writing that they may elect to have the claims and issues of the complaint decided in a civil action commenced and maintained by the commission. Either the complainant or the respondent may make such an election by notifying the commission of the complainant's or respondent's desire to do so. A party shall make an election for a civil action no later than twenty (20) days after receiving notice of permission to do so.

If an election is made under this section, no later than sixty (60) days after the election is made, the commission shall commence a civil action in the chancery court or circuit court in a county in which the subject of the complaint occurs, or in a county in which a respondent resides or has the respondent's principal place of business.

In a civil action brought under this section, the court may grant relief as it deems appropriate, including any permanent or temporary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other equitable relief, and may award to any person compensatory and punitive damages. Parties to a civil action brought pursuant to this section shall have the right to a jury trial.

Acts 1992, ch. 1027, § 9; 1996, ch. 777, § 10; 2016, ch. 863, § 2.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 863, 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all actions accruing on or after April 19, 2016.

4-21-313. Limitations on compensatory damage amounts — Exclusions from application of limits.

For any cause of action arising under § 4-21-401, § 8-50-103, or § 50-1-304, the sum of the amount of compensatory damages awarded for future pecuniary losses, emotional pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life, and other nonpecuniary losses, shall not exceed, for each complaining party:

In the case of a cause of action arising under § 50-1-304 and an employer who has less than eight (8) employees at the time the cause of action arose, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

In the case of an employer who has eight (8) or more but fewer than fifteen (15) employees at the time the cause of action arose, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

In the case of an employer who has more than fourteen (14) and fewer than one hundred one (101) employees at the time the cause of action arose, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);

In the case of an employer who has more than one hundred (100) and fewer than two hundred one (201) employees at the time the cause of action arose, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

In the case of an employer who has more than two hundred (200) and fewer than five hundred one (501) employees at the time the cause of action arose, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000); and

In the case of an employer who has more than five hundred (500) employees at the time the cause of action arose, three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

The limitations in subsection (a) shall not apply to backpay, interest on backpay, front pay, or any equitable relief.

The court shall not inform a jury of the limitations in subsection (a), but the court shall conform any judgment to comply with the limitations.

For the purpose of determining when the cause of action arose under subsection (a), the court shall determine the number of employees employed by the employer on the date when the adverse employment action giving rise to the employee's claim occurred.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 2; 2016, ch. 593, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning employment litigation in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 995.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to all actions accruing on or after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 7 provided that nothing in the act shall require the Tennessee human rights commission, created pursuant to §4-21-201, to provide training or education in addition to its current operations.

Acts 2016, ch. 593, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to causes of action accruing on or after March 10, 2016.

4-21-314. Simultaneous action in state and federal courts concerning common nucleus of operative facts prohibited.

No employee may concurrently maintain any cause of action in state court under §4-21-401, §8-50-103, or §50-1-304, while at the same time prosecuting an action in federal court based on a common nucleus of operative facts. Upon motion of the employer, the state court shall dismiss any action maintained under §4-21-401, §8-50-103, or §50-1-304, in which the employee is concurrently prosecuting an action based on a common nucleus of operative facts in federal court.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning employment litigation in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 995.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to all actions accruing on or after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 995, 7 provided that nothing in the act shall require the Tennessee human rights commission, created pursuant to §4-21-201, to provide training or education in addition to its current operations.